Maine, session 132, LD886.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1598-A is enacted to read:
§1598-A. Medication abortions
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Abortion" has the same meaning as in section 1598, subsection 2, paragraph A.
B. "Health care professional" has the same meaning as in section 1596, subsection 1,
paragraph C.
C. "Medication abortion" means an abortion resulting from the ingestion of a chemical
agent or drug.
2. Medication abortions. The following provisions apply to medication abortions.
A. A person may not purchase or obtain through online sources a chemical agent or
drug used for medication abortions.
B. A person opting to undergo a medication abortion must obtain a prescription from
a health care professional for a chemical agent or drug to be used for a medication
abortion, and that health care professional shall oversee the medication abortion in
person.
C. A health care professional overseeing a medication abortion shall inform the patient:
(1) Of the steps involved in the medication abortion;
(2) What the patient will experience following ingestion of the chemical agent or
drug for the medication abortion;
(3) Of any physical, emotional or spiritual risk of undergoing the medication
abortion; and
(4) Of any chemical agent, drug or other means by which the medication abortion
may be reversed.